Nebraska, session 109, LB374.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB374 LB374
2025 2025
Section 1. Section 38-101, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
38-101 Sections 38-101 to 38-1,148 and the following practice acts
shall be known and may be cited as the Uniform Credentialing Act:
(1) The Advanced Practice Registered Nurse Practice Act;
(2) The Alcohol and Drug Counseling Practice Act;
(3) The Athletic Training Practice Act;
(4) The Audiology and Speech-Language Pathology Practice Act;
(5) The Behavior Analyst Practice Act;
(6) The Certified Nurse Midwifery Practice Act;
(7) The Certified Registered Nurse Anesthetist Practice Act;
(8) The Chiropractic Practice Act;
(9) The Clinical Nurse Specialist Practice Act;
(10) The Cosmetology, Electrology, Esthetics, Nail Technology, and
Body Art Practice Act;
(11) The Dentistry Practice Act;
(12) The Dialysis Patient Care Technician Registration Act;
(13) The Emergency Medical Services Practice Act;
(14) The Environmental Health Specialists Practice Act;
(15) The Funeral Directing and Embalming Practice Act;
(16) The Genetic Counseling Practice Act;
(17) The Hearing Instrument Specialists Practice Act;
(18) The Licensed Midwives Practical Nurse-Certified Practice Act
until November 1, 2017;
(19) The Massage Therapy Practice Act;
(20) The Medical Nutrition Therapy Practice Act;
(21) The Medical Radiography Practice Act;
(22) The Medicine and Surgery Practice Act;
(23) The Mental Health Practice Act;
(24) The Nurse Practice Act;
(25) The Nurse Practitioner Practice Act;
-2-

LB374 LB374
2025 2025
(26) The Nursing Home Administrator Practice Act;
(27) The Occupational Therapy Practice Act;
(28) The Optometry Practice Act;
(29) The Perfusion Practice Act;
(30) The Pharmacy Practice Act;
(31) The Physical Therapy Practice Act;
(32) The Podiatry Practice Act;
(33) The Psychology Practice Act;
(34) The Respiratory Care Practice Act;
(35) The Surgical First Assistant Practice Act; and
(36) The Veterinary Medicine and Surgery Practice Act.
If there is any conflict between any provision of sections 38-101 to
38-1,148 and any provision of a practice act, the provision of the
practice act shall prevail except as otherwise specifically provided in
section 38-129.02.
Sec. 2. Section 38-121, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
38-121 (1) No individual shall engage in the following practices
unless such individual has obtained a credential under the Uniform
Credentialing Act:
(a) Acupuncture;
(b) Advanced practice nursing;
(c) Alcohol and drug counseling;
(d) Asbestos abatement, inspection, project design, and training;
(e) Athletic training;
(f) Audiology;
(g) Speech-language pathology;
(h) Behavior Beginning one year after September 2, 2023, behavior
analysis;
(i) Body art;
(j) Chiropractic;
-3-

LB374 LB374
2025 2025
(k) Cosmetology;
(l) Dentistry;
(m) Dental hygiene;
(n) Electrology;
(o) Emergency medical services;
(p) Esthetics;
(q) Funeral directing and embalming;
(r) Genetic counseling;
(s) Hearing instrument dispensing and fitting;
(t) Lead-based paint abatement, inspection, project design, and
training;
(u) Licensed practical nurse-certified until November 1, 2017;
(v) Massage therapy;
(w) Medical nutrition therapy;
(x) Medical radiography;
(y) Medicine and surgery;
(z) Mental health practice;
(aa) Nail technology;
(bb) Nursing;
(cc) Nursing home administration;
(dd) Occupational therapy;
(ee) Optometry;
(ff) Osteopathy;
(gg) Perfusion;
(hh) Pharmacy;
(ii) Physical therapy;
(jj) Podiatry;
(kk) Professional midwifery;
(ll) (kk) Psychology;
(mm) (ll) Radon detection, measurement, and mitigation;
(nn) (mm) Respiratory care;
-4-

LB374 LB374
2025 2025
(oo) (nn) Surgical assisting; and
(pp) (oo) Veterinary medicine and surgery.
(2) No individual shall hold himself or herself out as any of the
following until such individual has obtained a credential under the
Uniform Credentialing Act for that purpose:
(a) Registered environmental health specialist;
(b) Certified marriage and family therapist;
(c) Certified professional counselor;
(d) Certified art therapist;
(e) Social worker; or
(f) Dialysis patient care technician.
(3) No business shall operate for the provision of any of the
following services unless such business has obtained a credential under
the Uniform Credentialing Act:
(a) Body art;
(b) Cosmetology;
(c) Emergency medical services;
(d) Esthetics;
(e) Funeral directing and embalming;
(f) Massage therapy; or
(g) Nail technology.
Sec. 3. Section 38-131, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
38-131 (1) An applicant for an initial license to practice as a
registered nurse, a licensed practical nurse, a physical therapist, a
physical therapy assistant, a psychologist, an advanced emergency medical
technician, an emergency medical technician, an audiologist, a speech-
language pathologist, a licensed independent mental health practitioner,
an occupational therapist, an occupational therapy assistant, a licensed
midwife, a dietitian, a certified social worker, a certified master
social worker, a licensed clinical social worker, a paramedic, a
-5-

LB374 LB374
2025 2025
physician, an osteopathic physician, a physician or osteopathic physician
who is an applicant for a temporary educational permit, a physician or
osteopathic physician who is an applicant for a temporary visiting
faculty permit, a physician assistant, a dentist, an optometrist, a
podiatrist, a veterinarian, an advanced practice registered nurse-nurse
practitioner, an advanced practice registered nurse-certified nurse
midwife, or an advanced practice registered nurse-certified registered
nurse anesthetist shall be subject to a criminal background check. Except
as provided in subsection (4) of this section, such an applicant for an
initial license shall submit a full set of fingerprints to the Nebraska
State Patrol for a criminal history record information check. The
applicant shall authorize release of the results of the national criminal
history record information check by the Federal Bureau of Investigation
to the department. The applicant shall pay the actual cost of the
fingerprinting and criminal background check.
(2) The Nebraska State Patrol is authorized to submit the
fingerprints of such applicants to the Federal Bureau of Investigation
and to issue a report to the department that includes the criminal
history record information concerning the applicant. The Nebraska State
Patrol shall forward submitted fingerprints to the Federal Bureau of
Investigation for a national criminal history record information check.
The Nebraska State Patrol shall issue a report to the department that
includes the criminal history record information concerning the
applicant.
(3) This section shall not apply to a dentist who is an applicant
for a dental locum tenens under section 38-1122, to a physician or
osteopathic physician who is an applicant for a physician locum tenens
under section 38-2036, or to a veterinarian who is an applicant for a
veterinarian locum tenens under section 38-3335.
(4) A physician or osteopathic physician who is an applicant for a
temporary educational permit shall have ninety days from the issuance of
-6-

LB374 LB374
2025 2025
the permit to comply with subsection (1) of this section and shall have
such permit suspended after such ninety-day period if the criminal
background check is not complete or revoked if the criminal background
check reveals that the applicant was not qualified for the permit.
(5) The department and the Nebraska State Patrol may adopt and
promulgate rules and regulations concerning costs associated with the
fingerprinting and the national criminal history record information
check.
(6) For purposes of interpretation by the Federal Bureau of
Investigation, the term department in this section means the Division of
Public Health of the Department of Health and Human Services.
Sec. 4. Section 38-167, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
38-167 (1) Boards shall be designated as follows:
(a) Board of Advanced Practice Registered Nurses;
(b) Board of Alcohol and Drug Counseling;
(c) Board of Athletic Training;
(d) Board of Audiology and Speech-Language Pathology;
(e) Board of Behavior Analysts;
(f) Board of Chiropractic;
(g) Board of Cosmetology, Electrology, Esthetics, Nail Technology,
and Body Art;
(h) Board of Dentistry;
(i) Board of Emergency Medical Services;
(j) Board of Registered Environmental Health Specialists;
(k) Board of Funeral Directing and Embalming;
(l) Board of Hearing Instrument Specialists;
(m) Board of Massage Therapy;
(n) Board of Medical Nutrition Therapy;
(o) Board of Medical Radiography;
(p) Board of Medicine and Surgery;
-7-

LB374 LB374
2025 2025
(q) Board of Mental Health Practice;
(r) Board of Licensed Midwives;
(s) (r) Board of Nursing;
(t) (s) Board of Nursing Home Administration;
(u) (t) Board of Occupational Therapy Practice;
(v) (u) Board of Optometry;
(w) (v) Board of Pharmacy;
(x) (w) Board of Physical Therapy;
(y) (x) Board of Podiatry;
(z) (y) Board of Psychology;
(aa) (z) Board of Respiratory Care Practice; and
(bb) (aa) Board of Veterinary Medicine and Surgery.
(2) Any change made by the Legislature of the names of boards listed
in this section shall not change the membership of such boards or affect
the validity of any action taken by or the status of any action pending
before any of such boards. Any such board newly named by the Legislature
shall be the direct and only successor to the board as previously named.
Sec. 5. Section 38-606, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
38-606 Certified nurse midwife means a person certified by a board-
approved certifying body and licensed under the Advanced Practice
Registered Nurse Practice Act to practice certified nurse midwifery in
the State of Nebraska. Nothing in the Certified Nurse Midwifery Practice
Act is intended to restrict the practice of registered nurses. Nothing in
the act is intended to apply to licensed midwives practicing within the
scope of practice authorized under the Licensed Midwives Practice Act.
Sec. 6. Section 38-618, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
38-618 Nothing in the Certified Nurse Midwifery Practice Act shall
be interpreted to permit independent practice. Nothing in the act shall
prohibit the practice of professional midwifery by a licensed midwife
-8-

LB374 LB374
2025 2025
under the Licensed Midwives Practice Act.
Sec. 7. Section 38-2025, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
38-2025 The following classes of persons shall not be construed to
be engaged in the unauthorized practice of medicine:
(1) Persons rendering gratuitous services in cases of emergency;
(2) Persons administering ordinary household remedies;
(3) The members of any church practicing its religious tenets,
except that they shall not prescribe or administer drugs or medicines,
perform surgical or physical operations, nor assume the title of or hold
themselves out to be physicians, and such members shall not be exempt
from the quarantine laws of this state;
(4) Students of medicine who are studying in an accredited school or
college of medicine and who gratuitously prescribe for and treat disease
under the supervision of a licensed physician;
(5) Physicians who serve in the armed forces of the United States or
the United States Public Health Service or who are employed by the United
States Department of Veterans Affairs or other federal agencies, if their
practice is limited to that service or employment;
(6) Physicians who are licensed in good standing to practice
medicine under the laws of another state when incidentally called into
this state or contacted via electronic or other medium for consultation
with a physician licensed in this state. For purposes of this
subdivision, consultation means evaluating the medical data of the
patient as provided by the treating physician and rendering a
recommendation to such treating physician as to the method of treatment
or analysis of the data. The interpretation of a radiological image by a
physician who specializes in radiology is not a consultation;
(7) Physicians who are licensed in good standing to practice
medicine in another state but who, from such other state, order
diagnostic or therapeutic services on an irregular or occasional basis,
-9-

LB374 LB374
2025 2025
to be provided to an individual in this state, if such physicians do not
maintain and are not furnished for regular use within this state any
office or other place for the rendering of professional services or the
receipt of calls;
(8) Physicians who are licensed in good standing to practice
medicine in another state and who, on an irregular and occasional basis,
are granted temporary hospital privileges to practice medicine and
surgery at a hospital or other medical facility licensed in this state;
(9) Persons providing or instructing as to use of braces, prosthetic
appliances, crutches, contact lenses, and other lenses and devices
prescribed by a physician licensed to practice medicine while working
under the direction of such physician;
(10) Dentists practicing their profession when licensed and
practicing in accordance with the Dentistry Practice Act;
(11) Optometrists practicing their profession when licensed and
practicing under and in accordance with the Optometry Practice Act;
(12) Osteopathic physicians practicing their profession if licensed
and practicing under and in accordance with sections 38-2029 to 38-2033;
(13) Chiropractors practicing their profession if licensed and
practicing under the Chiropractic Practice Act;
(14) Podiatrists practicing their profession when licensed to
practice in this state and practicing under and in accordance with the
Podiatry Practice Act;
(15) Psychologists practicing their profession when licensed to
practice in this state and practicing under and in accordance with the
Psychology Interjurisdictional Compact or the Psychology Practice Act;
(16) Advanced practice registered nurses practicing in their
clinical specialty areas when licensed under the Advanced Practice
Registered Nurse Practice Act and practicing under and in accordance with
their respective practice acts;
(17) Surgical first assistants practicing in accordance with the
-10-

LB374 LB374
2025 2025
Surgical First Assistant Practice Act;
(18) Licensed midwives practicing in accordance with the Licensed
Midwives Practice Act;
(19) (18) Persons licensed or certified under the laws of this state
to practice a limited field of the healing art, not specifically named in
this section, when confining themselves strictly to the field for which
they are licensed or certified, not assuming the title of physician,
surgeon, or physician and surgeon, and not professing or holding
themselves out as qualified to prescribe drugs in any form or to perform
operative surgery;
(20) (19) Persons obtaining blood specimens while working under an
order of or protocols and procedures approved by a physician, registered
nurse, or other independent health care practitioner licensed to practice
by the state if the scope of practice of that practitioner permits the
practitioner to obtain blood specimens;
(21) (20) Physicians who are licensed in good standing to practice
medicine under the laws of another state or jurisdiction who accompany an
athletic team or organization into this state for an event from the state
or jurisdiction of licensure. This exemption is limited to treatment
provided to such athletic team or organization while present in Nebraska;
(22) (21) Persons who are not licensed, certified, or registered
under the Uniform Credentialing Act, to whom are assigned tasks by a
physician or osteopathic physician licensed under the Medicine and
Surgery Practice Act, if such assignment of tasks is in a manner
consistent with accepted medical standards and appropriate to the skill
and training, on the job or otherwise, of the persons to whom the tasks
are assigned. For purposes of this subdivision, assignment of tasks means
the routine care, activities, and procedures that (a) are part of the
routine functions of such persons who are not so licensed, certified, or
registered, (b) reoccur frequently in the care of a patient or group of
patients, (c) do not require such persons who are not so licensed,
-11-

LB374 LB374
2025 2025
certified, or registered to exercise independent clinical judgment, (d)
do not require the performance of any complex task, (e) have results
which are predictable and have minimal potential risk, and (f) utilize a
standard and unchanging procedure; and
(23) (22) Other trained persons employed by a licensed health care
facility or health care service defined in the Health Care Facility
Licensure Act or clinical laboratory certified pursuant to the federal
Clinical Laboratories Improvement Act of 1967, as amended, or Title XVIII
or XIX of the federal Social Security Act to withdraw human blood for
scientific or medical purposes.
Any person who has held or applied for a license to practice
medicine and surgery in this state, and such license or application has
been denied or such license has been refused renewal or disciplined by
order of limitation, suspension, or revocation, shall be ineligible for
the exceptions described in subdivisions (5) through (8) of this section
until such license or application is granted or such license is renewed
or reinstated. Every act or practice falling within the practice of
medicine and surgery as defined in section 38-2024 and not specially
excepted in this section shall constitute the practice of medicine and
surgery and may be performed in this state only by those licensed by law
to practice medicine in Nebraska.
Sec. 8. Sections 8 to 28 of this act shall be known and may be
cited as the Licensed Midwives Practice Act.
Sec. 9. For purposes of the Licensed Midwives Practice Act and
elsewhere in the Uniform Credentialing Act, unless the context otherwise
requires, the definitions found in sections 10 to 15 of this act apply.
Sec. 10. Board means the Board of Licensed Midwives.
Sec. 11. Certified professional midwife means a person who holds a
current credential as a certified professional midwife from the North
American Registry of Midwives or its successor organization.
Sec. 12. Client means a person under the care of a licensed midwife
-12-

LB374 LB374
2025 2025
and such person's fetus or newborn.
Sec. 13. Direct-entry midwife means a person who has been trained
in midwifery without first completing a course in nursing.
Sec. 14. Licensed midwife means a midwife who holds a current
license under the Licensed Midwives Practice Act.
Sec. 15. Professional midwifery means the practice of providing
primary maternity care that is consistent with national professional
midwifery standards to a client during essentially normal preconception,
pregnancy, labor, delivery, postpartum, and newborn periods.
Sec. 16. The board shall consist of five members as provided in
section 38-166. Three of the members shall be certified professional
midwives licensed under the Uniform Credentialing Act, one member shall
be a physician licensed under the Uniform Credentialing Act to practice
medicine in Nebraska who has professional experience consulting for and
collaborating with direct-entry midwives, and one member shall be a
public member who has received direct-entry midwifery services.
Sec. 17. (1) No person shall engage in professional midwifery or in
any way advertise or purport to be engaged in the practice of
professional midwifery unless such person is licensed by the department
or by a state with similar licensure requirements to the Licensed
Midwives Practice Act, as determined by the board.
(2) An applicant for licensure as a licensed midwife shall show to
the satisfaction of the department that the applicant:
(a) Has complied with the Licensed Midwives Practice Act and the
applicable rules and regulations adopted and promulgated under the act;
(b) Has a high school diploma or its equivalent;
(c) Is a certified professional midwife; and
(d) Has successfully completed an educational program or pathway
accredited by the Midwifery Education Accreditation Council, or a similar
organization as approved by the board, or has obtained a midwifery bridge
certificate from the North American Registry of Midwives, or a similar
-13-

LB374 LB374
2025 2025
organization as approved by the board.
(3) The department may, with the approval of the board, grant
temporary licensure as a licensed midwife for up to one hundred twenty
days upon application (a) to graduates of an approved professional
midwifery educational program pending results of the first certifying
examination following graduation and (b) to certified professional
midwives currently licensed in another state pending completion of the
application for a Nebraska license. A temporary license issued pursuant
to this subsection may be extended for up to one year with the approval
of the board.
(4) An applicant who is a military spouse may apply for a temporary
license as provided in section 38-129.01.
(5) Any person practicing professional midwifery based on licensure
in another state under subsection (1) of this section shall agree to be
subject to the jurisdiction of the department and the board under the
Licensed Midwives Practice Act and shall not be required to establish
residency in Nebraska.
Sec. 18. (1) A licensed midwife may (a) attend cases of
physiological childbirth, (b) provide preconception, prenatal,
intrapartum, and postpartum care, (c) provide normal gynecological
services for women, and (d) provide care for the newborn immediately
following birth and for up to six weeks after birth.
(2) A licensed midwife who attends a birth shall prepare and file a
birth certificate as required in section 71-604.
(3) The conditions under which a professional midwife is required to
refer cases to a collaborating licensed physician or advanced practice
registered nurse shall be specified in rules and regulations adopted and
promulgated pursuant to section 38-126.
Sec. 19. (1) The Licensed Midwives Practice Act shall not prohibit
the performance of the functions of a professional midwife by an
unlicensed person if performed:
-14-

LB374 LB374
2025 2025
(a) In an emergency situation;
(b) By a legally qualified person from another state employed by the
United States Government and performing official duties in this state; or
(c) By a person participating in a course of study to prepare for
the practice of professional midwifery.
(2) The Licensed Midwives Practice Act does not:
(a) Require licensure under the act or otherwise limit or regulate
the practice of a qualified member of another profession, including, but
not limited to, a nurse practitioner or a certified nurse midwife,
providing services that would constitute professional midwifery under the
act;
(b) Require licensure under the act for a person assisting a
licensed midwife; or
(c) Require licensure under the act for a person to provide care in
accordance with the tenets and practices of any bona fide church or
religious denomination or in accordance with such person's sincerely held
religious belief, practice, or observance.
Sec. 20. The practice of professional midwifery shall not
constitute the practice of medicine, nursing, certified nurse midwifery,
or emergency medical care.
Sec. 21. The board shall adopt rules and regulations pursuant to
section 38-126 regarding:
(1) The standards of practice of professional midwifery based on
rules established by the National Association of Certified Professional
Midwives or its successor organization and the North American Registry of
Midwives or its successor organization;
(2) Appropriate testing for clients, including, but not limited to,
laboratory tests and ultrasounds;
(3) Authorization for a licensed midwife to obtain and administer
all of the following during the practice of professional midwifery:
(a) Antihemorrhagic agents, including, but not limited to, oxytocin,
-15-

LB374 LB374
2025 2025
misoprostol, and methylergonovine;
(b) Intravenous fluids for stabilization of a laboring or postpartum
woman;
(c) Neonatal injectable vitamin K;
(d) Newborn antibiotic eye prophylaxis;
(e) Oxygen;
(f) Intravenous antibiotics for group B streptococcal antibiotic
prophylaxis;
(g) Rho (D) immune globulin;
(h) Local anesthetic;
(i) Epinephrine;
(j) Food, food extracts, dietary supplements, homeopathic remedies,
plant substances that are not designated as prescription drugs or
controlled substances, and over-the-counter medications; and
(k) Other drugs consistent with the practice of professional
midwifery, not to include controlled substances;
(4) Administration of a drug prescribed by a licensed health care
provider for a client;
(5) Authorization to obtain and use appropriate equipment and
devices, including, but not limited to, Doppler ultrasound, phlebotomy
supplies, hemoglobinometer, instruments, and sutures;
(6) Management of the postpartum period, including suturing of
lacerations, including the administration of a local anesthetic;
(7) Management of the newborn period including: (a) Providing care
for the newborn, including performing a normal newborn examination; (b)
resuscitating a newborn; and (c) performing the newborn metabolic
screening required under section 71-519;
(8) Prohibition of the use of forceps or a vacuum extractor;
(9) Requirements for a written plan for the consultation,
collaboration, and emergency transfer of the client and newborn, when
necessary, and for submission of the plan to the board;
-16-

LB374 LB374
2025 2025
(10) Requirements for a client consent form to be signed by the
client and maintained by the licensed midwife. The consent form shall
describe the licensed midwife's qualifications, a copy of the licensed
midwife's emergency plan, and the benefits and risks of birth in the
client's setting of choice; and
(11) Authorization to obtain a blood spot specimen in accordance
with section 71-519.
Sec. 22. A licensed midwife shall not order or administer narcotic
drugs or terminate or assist with the termination of a pregnancy.
Sec. 23. A licensed midwife may practice professional midwifery at
any location and shall not be required to practice under the supervision
of or under a collaborative practice agreement with another health care
provider.
Sec. 24. A client shall not be required to be assessed by another
health care professional.
Sec. 25. A health care provider who accepts a transfer of a client
from a licensed midwife shall not be liable for an outcome arising from
actions of the licensed midwife.
Sec. 26. Nothing in the Licensed Midwives Practice Act abridges,
limits, or changes in any way the right of parents to deliver their baby
where, when, how, and with whom they choose, regardless of credentialed
status.
Sec. 27. The department shall establish and collect fees for
initial licensure and renewal under the Licensed Midwives Practice Act as
provided in sections 38-151 to 38-157.
Sec. 28. A person licensed as a licensed midwife in this state
under the Licensed Midwives Practice Act may use the title licensed
midwife and the abbreviation LM.
Sec. 29. An individual or group policy of accident or health
insurance that provides newborn care benefits or maternity benefits, not
limited to complications of pregnancy, shall provide coverage for
-17-

LB374 LB374
2025 2025
maternity services rendered by a licensed midwife, regardless of the site
of services. Coverage for maternity services provided by a licensed
midwife shall not be subject to any greater copayment, deductible, or
coinsurance than is applicable to any other similar benefit provided by
the policy.
Sec. 30. Original sections 38-606 and 38-618, Reissue Revised
Statutes of Nebraska, and sections 38-101, 38-121, 38-131, 38-167, and
38-2025, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024, are repealed.
-18-